Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. REGULATION OF LAND USE, STRUCTURES, BUSINESSES, AND RELATED ACTIVITIES

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL REGULATORY AUTHORITY

CHAPTER 229. MISCELLANEOUS REGULATORY AUTHORITY OF MUNICIPALITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. REGULATION OF FIREARMS, KNIVES, AND EXPLOSIVES

Sec. 229.001. FIREARMS; AIR GUNS; KNIVES; EXPLOSIVES.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including Section 43.002 of this code and Chapter 251, Agriculture Code, a municipality may not adopt or enforce regulations that:

(1) relate to:

(A) the transfer, possession, wearing, carrying, ownership, storage, transportation, licensing, or registration of firearms, air guns, knives, ammunition, or firearm or air gun supplies or accessories;

(B) commerce in firearms, air guns, knives, ammunition, or firearm or air gun supplies or accessories; or

(C) the discharge of a firearm or air gun at a sport shooting range; or

(2) require an owner of a firearm to obtain liability insurance coverage for damages resulting from negligent or wilful acts involving the use of the firearm.

(a-1) An ordinance, resolution, rule, or policy adopted or enforced by a municipality, or an official action, including in any legislative, police power, or proprietary capacity, taken by an employee or agent of a municipality in violation of this section is void.

(b) Subsection (a) does not affect the authority a municipality has under another law to:

(1) require residents or public employees to be armed for personal or national defense, law enforcement, or another lawful purpose;

(2) regulate the discharge of firearms or air guns within the limits of the municipality, other than at a sport shooting range;

(3) except as provided by Subsection (b-1), adopt or enforce a generally applicable zoning ordinance, land use regulation, fire code, or business ordinance;

(4) regulate the storage or transportation of explosives to protect public health and safety, except that 25 pounds or less of black powder for each private residence and 50 pounds or less of black powder for each retail dealer are not subject to regulation;

(5) regulate the carrying of an air gun or firearm, other than a handgun carried by a person not otherwise prohibited by law from carrying a handgun, at a:

(A) public park;

(B) public meeting of a municipality, county, or other governmental body;

(C) political rally, parade, or official political meeting; or

(D) nonfirearms-related school, college, or professional athletic event;

(6) regulate the carrying of a firearm by a person licensed to carry a handgun under Subchapter H, Chapter 411, Government Code, in accordance with Section 411.209, Government Code;

(7) regulate the hours of operation of a sport shooting range, except that the hours of operation may not be more limited than the least limited hours of operation of any other business in the municipality other than a business permitted or licensed to sell or serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption;

(8) regulate the carrying of an air gun by a minor on:

(A) public property; or

(B) private property without consent of the property owner; or

(9) except as provided by Subsection (d-1), regulate or prohibit an employee's carrying or possession of a firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition in the course of the employee's official duties.

(b-1) The exception provided by Subsection (b)(3) does not apply if the ordinance or regulation is designed or enforced to effectively restrict or prohibit the manufacture, sale, purchase, transfer, or display of firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition that is otherwise lawful in this state.

(c) The exception provided by Subsection (b)(5) does not apply if the firearm or air gun is in or is carried to or from an area designated for use in a lawful hunting, fishing, or other sporting event and the firearm or air gun is of the type commonly used in the activity.

(d) Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize the seizure or confiscation of any firearm, air gun, knife, ammunition, or firearm or air gun supplies or accessories from an individual who is lawfully carrying or possessing the firearm, air gun, knife, ammunition, or firearm or air gun supplies or accessories.

(d-1) The exception provided by Subsection (b)(9) does not authorize a municipality to regulate an employee's carrying or possession of a firearm in violation of Subchapter G, Chapter 52, Labor Code.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Air gun" means any gun that discharges a pellet, BB, or paintball by means of compressed air, gas propellant, or a spring.

(2) "Ammunition" means fixed cartridge ammunition, shotgun shells, individual components of fixed cartridge ammunition and shotgun shells, projectiles for muzzle-loading firearms, or any propellant used in firearms or ammunition.

(3) "Firearm or air gun accessory" means a device specifically designed or adapted to:

(A) enable the wearing or carrying by a person, or the storage or mounting in or on a conveyance, of a firearm or air gun; or

(B) be inserted into or affixed to a firearm or air gun to enable, alter, or improve the functioning or capabilities of the firearm.

(4) "Knife" has the meaning assigned by Section 46.01, Penal Code.

(5) "Sport shooting range" has the meaning assigned by Section 250.001.

(f) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state to obtain a temporary or permanent injunction against a municipality adopting a regulation in violation of this section. The attorney general may recover reasonable expenses incurred in obtaining an injunction under this subsection, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition costs.

(g) This section does not limit the enforceability of any state or federal law.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 229, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 10.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 215.001 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 12.002(10), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 18 (S.B. 112), Sec. 5, eff. April 27, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 624 (S.B. 766), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 598 (S.B. 987), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1210 (S.B. 1400), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 34, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (H.B. 905), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 700 (H.B. 905), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 3231), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (H.B. 1927), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 998 (H.B. 1500), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (H.B. 3137), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 229.002. REGULATION OF DISCHARGE OF WEAPON. A municipality may not apply a regulation relating to the discharge of firearms or other weapons in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality or in an area annexed by the municipality after September 1, 1981, if the firearm or other weapon is:

(1) a shotgun, air rifle or pistol, BB gun, or bow and arrow discharged:

(A) on a tract of land of 10 acres or more and more than 150 feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property; and

(B) in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract; or

(2) a center fire or rim fire rifle or pistol of any caliber discharged:

(A) on a tract of land of 50 acres or more and more than 300 feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property; and

(B) in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 18 (S.B. 734), Sec. 4, eff. May 3, 2005.

Sec. 229.003. REGULATION OF DISCHARGE OF WEAPON BY CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to a municipality located wholly or partly in a county:

(1) with a population of one million or more;

(2) in which all or part of a municipality with a population of one million or more is located; and

(3) that is located adjacent to a county with a population of 2.5 million or more.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 229.002, a municipality may not apply a regulation relating to the discharge of firearms or other weapons in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality or in an area annexed by the municipality after September 1, 1981, if the firearm or other weapon is:

(1) a shotgun, air rifle or pistol, BB gun, or bow and arrow discharged:

(A) on a tract of land of 10 acres or more and:

(i) more than 1,000 feet from:

(a) the property line of a public tract of land, generally accessible by the public, that is routinely used for organized sporting or recreational activities or that has permanent recreational facilities or equipment; and

(b) the property line of a school, hospital, or commercial day-care facility;

(ii) more than 600 feet from:

(a) the property line of a residential subdivision; and

(b) the property line of a multifamily residential complex; and

(iii) more than 150 feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property; and

(B) in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract;

(2) a center fire or rim fire rifle or pistol of any caliber discharged:

(A) on a tract of land of 50 acres or more and:

(i) more than 1,000 feet from:

(a) the property line of a public tract of land, generally accessible by the public, that is routinely used for organized sporting or recreational activities or that has permanent recreational facilities or equipment; and

(b) the property line of a school, hospital, or commercial day-care facility;

(ii) more than 600 feet from:

(a) the property line of a residential subdivision; and

(b) the property line of a multifamily residential complex; and

(iii) more than 300 feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property; and

(B) in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract; or

(3) discharged at a sport shooting range, as defined by Section 250.001, in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of a tract of land.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1230 (S.B. 1742), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 81, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 145, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 229.004. REGULATION OF DISCHARGE OF WEAPON BY CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES. (a) This section applies only to a municipality located in a county in which the majority of the population of two or more municipalities with a population of 300,000 or more are located.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 229.002, a municipality may not apply a regulation relating to the discharge of firearms or other weapons in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality or in an area annexed by the municipality on or before September 1, 1981, if the firearm or other weapon is:

(1) a shotgun, air rifle or pistol, BB gun, or bow and arrow discharged:

(A) on a tract of land of 100 acres or more and more than 150 feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property; and

(B) in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract; or

(2) a center fire or rim fire rifle or pistol of any caliber discharged:

(A) on a tract of land of 100 acres or more and more than 300 feet from a residence or occupied building located on another property; and

(B) in a manner not reasonably expected to cause a projectile to cross the boundary of the tract.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 306 (H.B. 2127), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. REGULATION OF OUTDOOR LIGHTING

Sec. 229.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter, "major astronomical observatory" and "outdoor lighting" have the meanings assigned by Section 240.031.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 2857), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 229.052. APPLICABILITY. (a) This subchapter applies to a municipality located in a county any part of which is located within 57 miles of a major astronomical observatory at the McDonald Observatory.

(b) This subchapter does not apply to:

(1) outdoor lighting in existence or under construction on January 1, 2012; or

(2) the installation, maintenance, repair, or replacement of outdoor lighting owned or operated by an electric utility as defined by Section 31.002, Utilities Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 2857), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 229.053. REGULATION OF OUTDOOR LIGHTING. (a) The governing body of a municipality by ordinance shall regulate the installation and use of outdoor lighting.

(b) An ordinance adopted under this section must be designed to protect against the use of outdoor lighting in a way that interferes with scientific astronomical research of an observatory.

(c) In the ordinance, the governing body may:

(1) require that a permit be obtained from the municipality before the installation and use of certain types of outdoor lighting in a regulated area;

(2) establish a fee in an amount to cover the costs of administrating the issuance of the permit;

(3) prohibit the use of a type of outdoor lighting that is incompatible with the effective use of an observatory;

(4) establish requirements for the shielding of outdoor lighting; and

(5) regulate the times during which certain types of outdoor lighting may be used.

(d) The governing body may apply more stringent standards for areas in which the use of outdoor lighting has a greater impact on observatory activities.

(e) The governing body may adopt an ordinance under this section only after conducting a public hearing on the proposed ordinance. The governing body shall give at least two weeks' public notice of the hearing.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 2857), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 229.054. REGULATION OF SUBDIVISIONS. (a) The governing body of a municipality by ordinance shall establish standards relating to proposed subdivisions to minimize the interference with observatory activities caused by outdoor lighting.

(b) The governing body may not approve a subdivision plat unless the plat provides that outdoor lighting will comply with standards adopted under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 2857), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 229.055. ENFORCEMENT; PENALTY. (a) A municipality may sue in any court to enjoin a violation of this subchapter.

(b) A person who violates an ordinance adopted under this subchapter commits an offense. An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 2857), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER C. REGULATION OF SOLAR ENERGY DEVICES

Sec. 229.101. REGULATION OF SOLAR ENERGY DEVICES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Municipally owned utility" has the meaning assigned by Section 11.003, Utilities Code.

(2) "Small commercial customer" has the meaning assigned by Section 39.202(o), Utilities Code.

(3) "Solar energy device" has the meaning assigned by Section 171.107, Tax Code.

(b) A municipality may not prohibit or restrict the installation of a solar energy device by a residential or small commercial customer except to the extent:

(1) a property owner's association may prohibit the installation under Sections 202.010(d)(1) through (7), Property Code; or

(2) the interconnection guidelines and interconnection agreement of a municipally owned utility serving the customer's service area, the rules of the Public Utility Commission of Texas, or the protocols of an independent organization certified under Section 39.151, Utilities Code, limit the installation of solar energy devices due to reliability, power quality, or safety of the distribution system.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 561 (S.B. 398), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 229.901. AUTHORITY TO REGULATE ANIMAL BUSINESSES. (a) A municipality may not adopt, enforce, or maintain an ordinance or rule that restricts, regulates, limits, or otherwise impedes a business involving the breeding, care, treatment, or sale of animals or animal products, including a veterinary practice, or the business's transactions if the person operating that business holds a license for the business that is issued by the federal government or a state.

(b) Except as provided by this subsection, a municipality may not adopt, enforce, or maintain an ordinance or rule that restricts, regulates, limits, or otherwise impedes the retail sale of dogs or cats. A municipality may enforce or maintain an ordinance or rule adopted before April 1, 2023, that restricts, regulates, limits, or otherwise impedes the retail sale of dogs or cats until the state adopts statewide regulation for the retail sale of dogs or cats, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 899 (H.B. 2127), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2023.